Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201457-1409
Appeal.

Any party aggrieved by a final order of the commission regarding
an application or assessment under the Major Oil Pipeline Siting Act, including,
but not limited to, a decision relating to the public interest, may appeal.
The appeal shall be in accordance with section
75-136.

Laws 2011, First Spec. Sess., LB1, § 10;

Laws 2013, LB545, § 1.